Massachusetts, session 194th, H4351.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 6E the following
chapter:-
CHAPTER 6F.
OFFICE OF FREEDMEN AFFAIRS.
Section 1. The commonwealth recognizes the unique needs of American Freedmen,
defined as descendants of persons emancipated from slavery in the United States. It
acknowledges their historical and ongoing marginalization, and cultural erasure. This chapter
establishes the office of freedmen Affairs, acknowledging the historical and ongoing
marginalization and cultural erasure of American Freedman, this office will preserve their
of 4

heritage, address ongoing inequities and improve social determinants of health through targeted
advocacy, policy recommendations and resource allocation.
Section 2. (a) The office of freedmen affairs is hereby established as a state agency to
provide resources, advocacy and oversight on matters affecting American Freedmen residing in
the commonwealth.
(b) The office shall be led by a director appointed by the governor. The director shall
serve a term of 5 years and may be reappointed for additional terms.
Section 3. The director of the office of freedmen affairs shall be responsible for the
supervision and management of the office of freedmen affairs work. This work includes, but is
not limited to:
(1) Providing guidance to the governor and legislature on policies and programs to
support American Freedmen residents.
(2) Advocating for the equitable allocation of state resources, funding, and opportunities
tailored to American Freedmen.
(3) Enhancing access to state programs, benefits and services for American Freedmen
through strategic outreach and education initiatives.
(4) Developing and implementing programs to expand economic opportunities and
workforce development tailored to the needs of American Freedmen.
(5) Establishing and managing pr genealogy research and historical documentation to
support individuals in identifying their American Freedmen heritage.
of 4

(6) Conducting policy analysis, program evaluations and progress reporting to ensure
state policies align with the needs of American Freedmen.
(7) Soliciting input from American Freedmen communities and other stakeholders to
shape the office’s priorities and activities.
(8) Partnering with public and private organizations to amplify the office’s impact and
ensure alignment with broader equity goals.
(9) Advising state agencies on challenges and barriers faced by American Freedmen
residents and recommend strategies to address them.
Section 4. (a) The office shall have adequate staff to perform its statutory duties,
including but not limited to experts in policy analysis, community outreach, genealogy and
financial planning.
(b) The office may contract with academic institutions, private consultants, organizations
dedicated to remedial justice or other professionals as necessary to fulfill its responsibilities.
Section 5. Annually, the office of freedmen affairs shall submit an annual report to the
governor no later than December 31. This report shall include:
(1) A summary of the office’s activities and accomplishments.
(2) An analysis of the status and well-being of American Freedmen residents in the
commonwealth.
(3) Recommendations for legislative or policy changes to address ongoing inequities.
of 4

Section 6. (a) The office shall be funded through annual appropriations by the general
court.
(b) The office may accept and solicit funds, including gifts, grants or donations, to
support its mission
of 4